Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1317
Training for
local board members.

The office shall
establish compulsory training for local board members which shall consist
of initial training programs followed by periodic inservice training programs.

Laws 1982, LB 714, § 17;

Laws 2012, LB998, § 15.